District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-917

Co-respondents as defendants; service of process.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 562, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-207, § 2(l), 49 DCR 7827

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-917.
1973 Ed., § 16-917.